csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_irr.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nindigonan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nindigon
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gidizhim
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gidizh
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nindigoog
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nindig
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: nindigoo
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gidigonaawaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gidigonaawaa
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gidinininim
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gidigowaag
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gidigowaa
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gidigoom
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: gidigoom
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gidigonan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gidigon
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gidinin
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gidigoog
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gidig
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gidigoo
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: gidigoo
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlObv: nindinimaa'
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlObv: gidinimaawaa'
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlObv: gidinimaa'
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3PlObv: odinaawaa'
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3PlObv: odinaa'
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlObv: nindinimaanaa'
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlObv: gidinimaanaa'
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlObv: inimaawa'
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: odigonaawaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: odigonaawaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nindinaag
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gidinaawaag
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gidinaag
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3PlProx: odigowaa'
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3PlProx: odigowaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nindinaanaanig
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gidinaanaanig
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: inaawag
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv: nindinimaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv: gidinimaawaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: gidinimaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv: odinaawaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv: odinaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv: nindinimaanaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv: gidinimaanaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv: inimaawan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: odigonini
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: odigonini
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: odigonan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: odigon
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nindinaa
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gidinaawaa
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gidinaa
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3SgProx: odigoo'
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3SgProx: odigoon
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nindinaanaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gidinaanaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: inaa
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nindigomin
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nindigomin
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gidizhimin
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gidizhimin
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nindigonaanig
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nindigonaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: nindigoomin
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gidigomin
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gidigomin
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gidigonaanig
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gidigonaan
     izhi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: gidigoomin
